Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-156
Specific tariffs.

Whenever any telecommunications company files a specific tariff for any new equipment, new telecommunications service feature of existing equipment, or rate not previously offered and the commission has not finally determined the tariff within sixty days thereafter, it shall become effective as filed. The tariff shall remain in effect until the commission determines an appropriate interim tariff or finally determines the matter. This section shall not apply to services of a type offered only by regulated telecommunications companies.

Laws 1976, LB 768, § 1;

Laws 1994, LB 414, § 112;

R.S.1943, (1996), § 75-616;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 55.